Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-554
Class I, II, or III school district; school board; quorum; meetings; open to public.

In all meetings of a school board of a Class I, II, or III school district, a majority of the members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. Regular meetings shall be held on or before the third Monday of every month. All meetings of the board shall be subject to the Open Meetings Act. Special meetings may be called by the president or any two members, but all members shall have notice of the time and place of meeting. If a school district is participating in an approved unified system as provided in section 79-4,108, regular meetings of such district's school board shall be held at least twice during the school year.

Laws 1881, c. 78, subdivision V, § 1, p. 352;

Laws 1885, c. 79, § 1, p. 324;

R.S.1913, § 6781;

C.S.1922, § 6322;

C.S.1929, § 79-501;

R.S.1943, § 79-501;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 78, p. 719;

Laws 1972, LB 1268, § 1;

Laws 1973, LB 429, § 1;

Laws 1980, LB 735, § 1;

Laws 1988, LB 812, § 2;

Laws 1990, LB 1109, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 689, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 836, § 32;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-439;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 307;

Laws 2003, LB 67, § 7;

Laws 2004, LB 821, § 25;

Laws 2018, LB377, § 39;

Laws 2024, LB1329, § 45.
July 19, 2024
Open Meetings Act, see section 84-1407.

Action of majority, without notice to other member, is not binding. State ex rel. Hunter v. Peters, 4 Neb. 254 (1876).